trunk/apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="outsh/ine__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sho/ot__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ots</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="plan__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/ink__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inks</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ites</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ote</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itten</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ban" a="doriua"><i>ban</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fan"><i>fan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pin"><i>pin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="plan"><i>plan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="prove"><i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sing"><i>s</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ring"><i>r</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="scan"><i>scan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shoot"><i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shun"><i>shun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sin"><i>sin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sling"><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="spring"><i>spr</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="think"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="write"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="write"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="grin"><i>grin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="con"><i>con</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stun"><i>stun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shoot in the dark" r="RL"><i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="rewrite"><i>rewr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="sling"><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tin"><i>tin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="skin"><i>skin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/>    </e>
